nl: Primaire plantaardige eiwitbron: Bananenbloesem; Kikkererwt; Tuinboneneiwit; Jackfruit; Linze of boon; Gemengde bronnen; Paddenstoel; Ander plantaardig eiwit; Erwteneiwit; Rijsteiwit; Soja; Zonnebloemeiwit; Tarwegluten (seitan); Anders
nb: Primær planteproteinkilde: Bananblomst; Kikert; Hestebønneprotein; Jackfrukt; Linse eller bønne; Blandede kilder; Sopp; Annet planteprotein; Erteprotein; Risprotein; Soya; Solsikkeprotein; Hvetegluten (seitan); Annet
bg-BG: Основен източник на растителен протеин: Бананов цвят; Нахут; Протеин от бакла; Джакфрут; Леща или боб; Смесени източници; Гъби; Друг растителен протеин; Грахов протеин; Оризов протеин; Соя; Слънчогледов протеин; Пшеничен глутен (сейтан); Друго
vi: Nguồn protein thực vật chính: Hoa chuối; Đậu gà; Protein đậu fava; Mít; Đậu lăng hoặc đậu hạt; Các nguồn hỗn hợp; Nấm; Protein thực vật khác; Protein đậu Hà Lan; Protein gạo; Đậu nành; Protein hướng dương; Gluten lúa mì (mì căn); Khác
sl-SI: Glavni vir rastlinskih beljakovin: Bananin cvet; Čičerika; Beljakovine boba; Kruhovec (jackfruit); Leča ali fižol; Mešani viri; Goba; Druge rastlinske beljakovine; Grahove beljakovine; Riževe beljakovine; Soja; Sončnične beljakovine; Pšenični gluten (sejtan); Drugo
hr-HR: Primarni izvor biljnih proteina: Cvijet banane; Slanutak; Protein boba; Jackfruit; Leća ili grah; Mješoviti izvori; Gljiva; Ostali biljni proteini; Protein graška; Protein riže; Soja; Protein suncokreta; Pšenični gluten (seitan); Ostalo
pt-PT: Fonte principal de proteína vegetal: Flor de bananeira; Grão-de-bico; Proteína de fava; Jaca; Lentilhas ou feijão; Fontes mistas; Cogumelo; Outra proteína vegetal; Proteína de ervilha; Proteína de arroz; Soja; Proteína de girassol; Glúten de trigo (seitan); Outra
en: Primary plant protein source: Banana blossom; Chickpea; Fava bean protein; Jackfruit; Lentil or bean; Mixed sources; Mushroom; Other plant protein; Pea protein; Rice protein; Soy; Sunflower protein; Wheat gluten (seitan); Other
da: Primær planteproteinkilde: Bananblomst; Kikært; Hestebønneprotein; Jackfrugt; Linse eller bønne; Blandede kilder; Champignon/svamp; Andet planteprotein; Ærteprotein; Risprotein; Soja; Solsikkeprotein; Hvedegluten (seitan); Anden
cs: Primární zdroj rostlinných bílkovin: Banánový květ; Cizrna; Protein z bobu obecného; Jackfruit; Čočka nebo fazole; Smíšené zdroje; Houba; Jiný rostlinný protein; Hrachový protein; Rýžový protein; Sója; Slunečnicový protein; Pšeničný lepek (seitan); Ostatní
sv: Primär växtproteinkälla: Bananblomma; Kikärta; Bondbönsprotein; Jackfrukt; Lins eller böna; Blandade källor; Svamp; Övrigt växtprotein; Ärtprotein; Risprotein; Soja; Solrosprotein; Vetegluten (seitan); Övrigt
pl: Podstawowe źródło białka roślinnego: Kwiat banana; Ciecierzyca; Białko bobu; Dżakfrut; Soczewica lub fasola; Mieszane źródła; Grzyby; Inne białko roślinne; Białko grochu; Białko ryżu; Soja; Białko słonecznika; Gluten pszenny (seitan); Inne
el: Κύρια φυτική πηγή πρωτεΐνης: Άνθος μπανάνας; Ρεβίθι; Πρωτεΐνη κουκιού; Jackfruit; Φακές ή φασόλια; Ανάμεικτες πηγές; Μανιτάρι; Άλλη φυτική πρωτεΐνη; Πρωτεΐνη μπιζελιού; Πρωτεΐνη ρυζιού; Σόγια; Πρωτεΐνη ηλίανθου; Γλουτένη σίτου (σεϊτάν); Άλλο
es: Fuente principal de proteínas vegetales: Flor de plátano; Garbanzo; Proteína de haba; Yaca; Lenteja o frijol; Fuentes mixtas; Hongo; Otra proteína vegetal; Proteína de guisante; Proteína de arroz; Soya; Proteína de girasol; Gluten de trigo (seitán); Otro
it: Fonte proteica vegetale principale: Fiori di banano; Cece; Proteine di fave; Jackfruit; Lenticchie o fagioli; Fonti miste; Fungo; Altre proteine vegetali; Proteine di piselli; Proteine del riso; Soia; Proteine del girasole; Glutine di grano (seitan); Altro
ko: 주요 식물성 단백질 공급원: 바나나 꽃; 병아리콩; 잠두콩 단백질; 잭프루트; 렌틸콩 또는 콩; 혼합 원재료; 버섯; 기타 식물성 단백질; 완두콩 단백질; 쌀 단백질; 대두; 해바라기 단백질; 밀 글루텐(세이탄); 기타
lt-LT: Pagrindinis augalinių baltymų šaltinis: Bananų žiedai; Avinžirniai; Pupų baltymai; Duonvaisiai; Lęšiai ar pupelės; Mišrūs šaltiniai; Grybai; Kiti augaliniai baltymai; Žirnių baltymai; Ryžių baltymai; Soja; Saulėgrąžų baltymai; Kviečių glitimas (seitanas); Kita
pt-BR: Fonte principal de proteína vegetal: Flor de bananeira; Grão-de-bico; Proteína de fava; Jaca; Lentilha ou feijão; Fontes mistas; Cogumelo; Outra proteína vegetal; Proteína de ervilha; Proteína de arroz; Soja; Proteína de girassol; Glúten de trigo (seitan); Outra
fr: Source principale de protéines végétales: Fleur de bananier; Pois chiche; Protéine de fève; Fruit du jacquier; Lentilles ou haricots; Sources mixtes; Champignon; Autre protéine végétale; Protéine de pois; Protéine de riz; Soja; Protéine de tournesol; Gluten de blé (seitan); Autre
ro-RO: Sursă principală de proteine vegetale: Floare de bananier; Năut; Proteine din fasole fava; Jackfruit; Linte sau fasole; Surse mixte; Ciuperci; Alte proteine vegetale; Proteine din mazăre; Proteine din orez; Soia; Proteine din floarea-soarelui; Gluten din grâu (seitan); Altele
fi: Ensisijainen kasviproteiinin lähde: Banaaninkukka; Kikherne; Härkäpapuproteiini; Jakkipuu; Linssi tai papu; Useita lähteitä; Sieni; Muu kasviproteiini; Herneproteiini; Riisiproteiini; Soija; Auringonkukkaproteiini; Vehnägluteeni (seitan); Muu
th: แหล่งโปรตีนจากพืชหลัก: หัวปลี; ถั่วลูกไก่; โปรตีนจากถั่วปากอ้า; ขนุน; ถั่วเลนทิลหรือถั่วอื่นๆ; จากหลายแหล่ง; เห็ด; โปรตีนพืชอื่นๆ; โปรตีนจากถั่วลันเตา; โปรตีนจากข้าว; ถั่วเหลือง; โปรตีนจากทานตะวัน; กลูเตนข้าวสาลี (เซตัน); อื่นๆ
de: Hauptquelle pflanzlichen Proteins: Bananenblüte; Kichererbse; Ackerbohnenprotein; Jackfrucht; Linse oder Bohne; Gemischte Quellen; Pilz; Anderes Pflanzenprotein; Erbsenprotein; Reisprotein; Soja; Sonnenblumenprotein; Weizengluten (Seitan); Sonstige
tr: Birincil bitkisel protein kaynağı: Muz çiçeği; Nohut; Bakla proteini; Jackfruit; Mercimek veya fasulye; Karışık kaynaklar; Mantar; Diğer bitkisel proteinler; Bezelye proteini; Pirinç proteini; Soya; Ayçiçeği proteini; Buğday gluteni (seitan); Diğer
ja: 主要な植物性タンパク質源: バナナのつぼみ; ひよこ豆; そら豆プロテイン; ジャックフルーツ; レンズ豆または豆類; 混合ソース; キノコ; その他の植物性プロテイン; ピープロテイン; ライスプロテイン; 大豆; ひまわりプロテイン; 小麦グルテン (セイタン); その他
sk-SK: Primárny zdroj rastlinných bielkovín: Banánový kvet; Cícer; Proteín z fava fazule; Jackfruit; Šošovica alebo fazuľa; Zmiešané zdroje; Huby; Iný rastlinný proteín; Hrachový proteín; Ryžový proteín; Sója; Slnečnicový proteín; Pšeničný glutén (seitan); Iné
zh-CN: 主要植物蛋白来源: 香蕉花; 鹰嘴豆; 蚕豆蛋白; 菠萝蜜; 小扁豆或豆类; 混合来源; 蘑菇; 其他植物蛋白; 豌豆蛋白; 大米蛋白; 大豆; 葵花籽蛋白; 小麦面筋 (Seitan); 其他
ru: Основной растительный источник белка: Цветы банана; Нут; Белок фасоли фава; Джекфрут; Чечевица или бобы; Смешанные источники; Грибы; Другой растительный белок; Гороховый белок; Рисовый белок; Соя; Подсолнечный белок; Пшеничный глютен (сейтан); Другое
hu: Elsődleges növényi fehérjeforrás: Banánvirág; Csicseriborsó; Lóbabfehérje; Jackfruit; Lencse vagy bab; Vegyes források; Gomba; Egyéb növényi fehérje; Borsófehérje; Rizsfehérje; Szója; Napraforgó-fehérje; Búzaglutén (szejtán); Egyéb
zh-TW: 主要植物性蛋白質來源: 香蕉花; 鷹嘴豆; 蠶豆蛋白; 波羅蜜; 扁豆或豆類; 混合來源; 蘑菇; 其他植物蛋白; 豌豆蛋白; 米蛋白; 大豆; 葵花籽蛋白; 小麥麵筋 (麵筋); 其他